Georgia, session 2025_26, SB141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
7 SECTION 1.
8 Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to revenue and taxation, is
9 amended in Article 2 of Chapter 2, relating to administration, by revising paragraph (2) of
10 subsection (c) and subparagraph (c)(6)(A) of Code Section 48-2-35, relating to refunds,
11 claims, and notice to political subdivision designee, as follows:
12 "(2) In the event the taxpayer desires a conference or hearing before the commissioner
13 or the commissioner's delegate in connection with any claim for refund, he or she shall
14 specify such desire in writing in the claim and, if the claim conforms with the
15 requirements of this Code section, the commissioner shall grant a conference at a time
16 he or she shall reasonably specify. A taxpayer may contest any claim for refund that is
S. B. 141
- 1 -

25 LC 50 1147S (SCS)
17 denied in whole or in part by filing with the commissioner a written protest at any time
18 within 30 45 days from the date of notice of refund denial or partial payment. Such 30
19 45 day period shall be extended for such additional period as may be agreed upon in
20 writing between the taxpayer and the commissioner during the initial 30 45 day period
21 or any extension thereof. In the event the taxpayer wishes to request a conference, that
22 request shall be included in the written protest. All protests shall be prepared in the form
23 and contain such information as the commissioner shall reasonably require and shall
24 include a summary statement of the grounds upon which the taxpayer relies, an
25 identification of the transactions being contested, and the reasons for disputing the
26 findings of the commissioner. The commissioner shall grant a conference before the
27 commissioner's designated officer or agent at a time specified and shall make reasonable
28 rules governing the conduct of conferences. The discretion given in this Code section to
29 the commissioner shall be reasonably exercised on all occasions."
30 "(6)(A) No action or proceeding for the recovery of a refund under this Code section
31 shall be commenced before the expiration of one year from the date of filing the claim
32 for refund unless the commissioner or the commissioner's delegate renders a decision
33 on the claim within that time, nor shall any action or proceeding be commenced after
34 the later of:
35 (i) The expiration of two years from the date the claim is denied; or
36 (ii) If a valid protest is filed under paragraph (2) of this subsection, 30 45 days after
37 the date of the department's notice of decision on such protest."
38 SECTION 2.
39 Said title is further amended in said article by revising subsection (a) of Code Section
40 48-2-38, relating to due date and interest on deferred taxes, as follows:
S. B. 141
- 2 -

25 LC 50 1147S (SCS)
41 "(a) Except as otherwise expressly provided by law, all state taxes and licenses except ad
42 valorem and income taxes shall be due and payable either with the return or within 30 45
43 days after notice, as the case may be."
44 SECTION 3.
45 Said title is further amended in said article by revising subsection (a) of Code Section
46 48-2-45, relating to service of notice of assessment, as follows:
47 "(a)(1) In all cases in which the commissioner is required by law to provide an
48 opportunity to appeal, the assessment of a tax or license fee shall become final if no
49 written appeal is filed by the taxpayer with the commissioner within 30 45 days of the
50 date of the notice of assessment.
51 (2) For the purposes of this subsection, the notice shall be deemed to have been given if
52 written notice is sent by registered or certified or first-class mail or by statutory overnight
53 delivery and addressed to the taxpayer at his or her last known address, as shown on the
54 records of the department."
55 SECTION 4.
56 Said title is further amended in said article by revising Code Section 48-2-46, relating to
57 procedures for protests, as follows:
58 "48-2-46.
59 Any taxpayer may contest any proposed assessment or license fee made or determined by
60 the commissioner by filing with the commissioner a written protest at any time within 30
61 45 days from the date of notice of the proposed assessment or license fee or within such
62 other time limit as may be specified within the notice of proposed assessment or license
63 fee, if a different time limit is specified. All protests shall be prepared in the form and
64 contain such information as the commissioner shall reasonably require and shall include
65 a summary statement of the grounds upon which the taxpayer relies and his or her reasons
S. B. 141
- 3 -

25 LC 50 1147S (SCS)
66 for disputing the finding of the commissioner. The filing of a written protest, a petition for
67 redetermination of a deficiency, or a written request by the taxpayer for additional time for
68 filing such a petition shall toll the period of limitations for making an assessment until the
69 petition is denied by the commissioner or the request is withdrawn in writing by the
70 taxpayer. In the event the taxpayer desires a conference or hearing, the fact of such desire
71 must be set out in the protest. The commissioner shall grant a conference before his or her
72 officers or agents as he or she may designate at a time he or she shall specify and shall
73 make such reasonable rules governing the conduct of conferences as he or she may deem
74 proper. The discretion given in this Code section to the commissioner shall be reasonably
75 exercised on all occasions."
76 SECTION 5.
77 Said title is further amended in said article by revising Code Section 48-2-54, relating to
78 action by commissioner to collect unpaid tax, as follows:
79 "48-2-54.
80 In the event any taxpayer fails to pay any tax due, the commissioner shall notify the
81 taxpayer and his or her surety or sureties by mailing a letter to their post office addresses
82 last known to the commissioner. If, after 30 45 days of mailing the notice, the amount due
83 remains unpaid, the commissioner shall bring an action to collect the amount due,
84 including, but not limited to, penalties, interest, and costs. It shall not be necessary to make
85 the defaulting taxpayer a party to any action that may be brought against his or her surety
86 or sureties."
87 SECTION 6.
88 Said title is further amended in said article by revising subsections (b) and (c) of Code
89 Section 48-2-59, relating to appeals, payment of taxes admittedly owed, bond, and costs, as
90 follows:
S. B. 141
- 4 -

25 LC 50 1147S (SCS)
91 "(b) The taxpayer shall commence an appeal by filing a petition with the Georgia Tax
92 Tribunal in accordance with Chapter 13A of Title 50 or the superior court within 30 45
93 days from the date of decision by the commissioner or at any time after the department
94 records a state tax execution pursuant to Code Section 48-3-42.
95 (c) Before the superior court shall have jurisdiction to entertain an appeal filed by any
96 aggrieved taxpayer, the taxpayer shall file with the clerk of the superior court a written
97 statement whereby the taxpayer agrees to pay on the date or dates the taxes become due all
98 taxes for which the taxpayer has admitted liability. Additionally, the taxpayer shall file
99 with the clerk of the superior court within 30 45 days from the date of decision by the
100 commissioner, except when the value of the appellant's title or interest in real property
101 owned in this state is in excess of the amount of the tax in dispute, a surety bond or other
102 security in an amount satisfactory to the clerk, conditioned to pay any tax over and above
103 that for which the taxpayer has admitted liability and which is found to be due by a final
104 judgment of the court, together with interest and costs. It shall be ground for dismissal of
105 the appeal if the taxpayer fails to pay all taxes admittedly owed upon the due date or dates
106 as provided by law. This subsection shall not apply to appeals filed with the Georgia Tax
107 Tribunal as provided in Chapter 13A of Title 50."
108 SECTION 7.
109 Said title is further amended in Article 3 of Chapter 6, relating to intangible recording tax,
110 by revising subsection (c) of Code Section 48-6-76, relating to procedure for protesting
111 intangible recording tax, payment under protest, special escrow fund, filing claim, approval
112 or denial by commissioner, and action for refund, as follows:
113 "(c) The taxpayer making a payment under written protest may file at any time within 30
114 45 days after the date of the payment a claim for refund of the protested amount of the
115 payment with the commissioner. Each claim shall be in writing, shall be in the form and
116 contain such information as the commissioner requires, and shall include a summary
S. B. 141
- 5 -

25 LC 50 1147S (SCS)
117 statement of the grounds upon which the taxpayer relies in contending that the collection
118 of the amount was erroneous or illegal. A copy of the claim shall be filed by the taxpayer
119 within the 30 45 day period with the collecting officer or said officer's successor who
120 collected the protested amount."
121 SECTION 8.
122 Said title is further amended in Article 2 of Chapter 7, relating to imposition, rate,
123 computation, exemptions, and credits, by revising subparagraph (d)(2)(C) of Code Section
124 48-7-31, relating to taxation of corporations and computation, allocation, and apportionment
125 of income, as follows:
126 "(C) If the allocation and apportionment provisions provided for in this paragraph do
127 not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer's business activity in this state, the
128 taxpayer may petition the commissioner for, or the commissioner may by regulation
129 require, with respect to all or any part of the taxpayer's business activity, if reasonable:
130 (i) Separate accounting;
131 (ii) The exclusion of any one or more of the factors;
132 (iii) The inclusion of one or more additional factors that will fairly represent the
133 taxpayer's business activity within this state; or
134 (iv) The employment of any other method to effectuate an equitable allocation and
135 apportionment of the taxpayer's income.
136 The denial of a petition under this subparagraph shall be appealable pursuant to Code
137 Section 48-2-59. Such an appeal shall be filed within 30 45 days of the date of the
138 commissioner's notice of denial;"
139 SECTION 9.
140 Said title is further amended in Article 4 of Chapter 7, relating to payment, deficiencies,
141 assessment, and collection, by revising subsection (e) of Code Section 48-7-82, relating to
S. B. 141
- 6 -

25 LC 50 1147S (SCS)
142 periods of limitation for assessment of taxes, collection by execution, and change or
143 correction of net income, as follows:
144 "(e)(1) Except as provided in Code Section 48-7-53, when a taxpayer's amount of net
145 income for any year under this chapter as returned to the United States Department of the
146 Treasury is changed or corrected by the commissioner of internal revenue or other officer
147 of the United States of competent authority, the taxpayer, within 180 days after the final
148 determination date of the changed or corrected net income, shall make a return to the
149 commissioner of the changed or corrected income, and the commissioner shall make
150 assessment within one year from the date the return required by this paragraph is filed or
151 the taxpayer shall claim a refund based on the change or correction within one year from
152 the date the return required by this paragraph is filed. If the taxpayer does not make the
153 return reflecting the changed or corrected net income and the commissioner receives from
154 the United States government or one of its agents a report reflecting the changed or
155 corrected net income, the commissioner shall make assessment for taxes due based on the
156 change or correction within five years from the date the report from the United States
157 government or its agent is actually received. If he or she chooses, the commissioner shall
158 have the authority to establish a de minimis amount upon which a taxpayer shall not be
159 required to comply with this subsection. For purposes of this subsection the final
160 determination date shall be determined as follows:
161 (A) Except as provided in subparagraph subparagraphs (B) and (C) of this paragraph,
162 the final determination date is the first day on which no changes or corrections for a
163 particular audit remain to be finally determined, whether by agreement, or, if appealed
164 or contested, by a final decision with respect to which all rights of appeal have been
165 waived or exhausted. For agreements required to be signed by the commissioner of
166 internal revenue and the taxpayer, the final determination date is the date on which the
167 last party signed the agreement; or
S. B. 141
- 7 -

25 LC 50 1147S (SCS)
168 (B) If the taxpayer filed as a member of a combined or consolidated group, the final
169 determination date is the first day on which no related changes or corrections for a
170 particular audit remain to be finally determined for the entire group; or
171 (C) If the federal adjustment results from filing an amended federal return, a federal
172 refund claim, or an administrative adjustment request, or if it is a federal adjustment
173 reported on an amended federal return or other similar report filed pursuant to Section
174 6225(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, the final determination date is the day on which
175 the amended return, refund claim, administrative adjustment request, or other similar
176 report was filed.
177 (2) In the event the taxpayer fails to notify the commissioner of the final determination
178 of his or her United States income taxes, the commissioner shall proceed to determine,
179 upon evidence that the commissioner has brought to his or her attention or that he or she
180 otherwise acquires, the corrected income of the taxpayer for the fiscal or calendar year.
181 If additional tax is determined to be due, the tax shall be assessed and collected. If it is
182 determined that there has been an overpayment of tax for the year, the taxpayer, by his
183 or her failure to notify the commissioner as required in paragraph (1) of this subsection,
184 shall forfeit his or her right to any refund due by reason of the change or correction. A
185 taxpayer who so fails to notify the commissioner, however, shall be entitled to equitable
186 recoupment of 90 percent of any overpayment so determined against any additional tax
187 liability so determined, the remaining 10 percent of the overpayment being totally
188 forfeited as a penalty for failure to make a return as required by paragraph (1) of this
189 subsection."
190 SECTION 10.
191 Said title is further amended in Article 1 of Chapter 9, relating to motor fuel tax, by revising
192 paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 48-9-12, relating to powers of commissioner,
S. B. 141
- 8 -

25 LC 50 1147S (SCS)
193 notice of license cancellation, retention of bonds, public inspection of records, estimated
194 assessments, time extensions, and list of licensed distributors, as follows:
195 "(5) Reinstate a canceled license when information is provided at a hearing or otherwise
196 within 30 45 days of cancellation which satisfies the commissioner that the license should
197 be reinstated;"
198 SECTION 11.
199 This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
200 SECTION 12.
201 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 141
- 9 -